Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5555.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 401. As used in this article: , "educational institution" (a) "Civil rights coordinator" means a title IX coordinator, title VI coordinator, or section 504 coordinator. (b) "Educational institution" means a public or private institution or a separate school or department of a public or private institution, includes an academy, college, elementary or secondary school, extension course, kindergarten, nursery, school system, school district, or university, and a business, nursing, professional, secretarial, technical, or vocational school, and includes an agent of an educational institution. (c) Discrimination because of a disability includes harassment. (d) "Federal financial assistance" means that term as defined under section 7501 of the single audit act of 1984, 31 USC 7501. (e) "Harassment" means unwelcome communication or conduct based on an individual's actual or perceived disability regardless of whether the unwelcome communication or conduct is direct, indirect, verbal, or nonverbal. Harassment includes, but is not limited to, unwelcome communication or conduct that is undertaken in whole or in part through the use of electronic messaging services, commercial mobile services, electronic communications, or other technology, that is intended to or does substantially interfere with an individual's ability to participate in or receive any aid, benefit, service, or opportunity from an education program or activity, or that creates an intimidating, hostile, or offensive environment. (f) "Section 504 coordinator" means an employee of or an individual paid by an entity that contracts with and acts on behalf of a recipient of federal financial assistance or any program or activity conducted by an executive agency or the United States Postal Service who is designated or authorized to coordinate the recipient's efforts to comply with the recipient's obligations under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973, 29 USC 794. (g) "Title IX coordinator" means an individual designated as a title IX coordinator under 34 CFR 106.8 who is responsible for overseeing compliance with title IX of the education amendments of 1972, 20 USC 1681 to 1688. (h) "Title VI coordinator" means an employee of or an individual paid by an entity that contracts with and acts on behalf of a recipient of federal financial assistance who is designated or authorized to coordinate the recipient's efforts to comply with the recipient's obligations under title VI of the civil rights act of 1964, 42 USC 2000d to 2000d-7. Sec. 402. (1) An educational institution shall not do any of the following: (a) Discriminate in any manner in the full utilization use of or benefit from the institution, or the services provided and rendered by the institution to an individual because of a disability that is unrelated to the individual's ability to utilize use and benefit from the institution or its services, or because of the use by an individual of adaptive devices or aids. A violation of this subdivision includes, but is not limited to, harassment described in subsection (2). (b) Exclude, expel, limit, or otherwise discriminate against an individual seeking admission as a student or an individual enrolled as a student in the terms, conditions, and privileges of the institution, because of a disability that is unrelated to the individual's ability to utilize and benefit from the institution, or because of the use by an individual of adaptive devices or aids. (c) Make or use a written or oral inquiry or form of application for admission that elicits or attempts to elicit information, or make or keep a record, concerning the disability of an applicant for admission for reasons contrary to the provisions or purposes of this act. (d) Print or publish or cause to be printed or published a catalog or other notice or advertisement indicating a preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based on the disability of an applicant that is unrelated to the applicant's ability to utilize and benefit from the institution or its services, or the use of adaptive devices or aids by an applicant for admission to the educational institution. (e) Announce or follow a policy of denial or limitation through a quota or otherwise of educational opportunities of a group or its members because of a disability that is unrelated to the group or member's ability to utilize and benefit from the institution or its services, or because of the use by the members of a group or an individual in the group of adaptive devices or aids. (f) Develop a curriculum or utilize textbooks and training or learning materials which promote or foster physical or mental stereotypes. (2) Subject to subsection (4), an educational institution violates subsection (1)(a) if an individual who uses or benefits from the institution, or the services, activities, or programs provided by the institution, or who attempts to do so, is subjected to harassment by any of the following individuals regardless of where the harassment occurs: (a) The educational institution's agent, employee, or other individual authorized by the educational institution to provide an aid, benefit, service, or opportunity under the educational institution's services, activities, or programs, including, but not limited to, a vendor, contractor, school board member, volunteer, or guest speaker, if the harassment is enabled or assisted by the authority exercised as an agent, employee, or other authorized individual of the educational institution. (b) If the educational institution receives notice of the harassment as described in subsection (3), any other individual. (3) An educational institution is considered to have received notice of harassment under subsection (2)(b) if an agent, employee, or other authorized individual of the educational institution, including, but not limited to, a vendor, contractor, school board member, volunteer, or guest speaker, knew, or in the exercise of reasonable care should have known, about the harassment, and both of the following apply: (a) Any of the following apply: (i) The agent, employee, or other authorized individual has the authority to take action to redress the harassment. (ii) The agent, employee, or other authorized individual has the responsibility to report harassment or similar misconduct by others to an administrator of the educational institution. (iii) The agent, employee, or other authorized individual receives a report of the harassment from an individual who reasonably believes that the agent, employee, or other authorized individual meets the requirements of subparagraph (i) or (ii). (b) The agent, employee, or other authorized individual's communications are not privileged or confidential under law. (4) An educational institution does not violate subsection (1)(a) as described in subsection (2)(b) if the institution demonstrates that it exercises reasonable care to prevent harassment and promptly remedies the effects of any harassment at issue. An educational institution demonstrates that it exercises reasonable care to prevent harassment and remedies the effects of harassment if it does all of the following: (a) Adequately publicizes and enforces both of the following: (i) A comprehensive harassment prevention policy. (ii) A harassment complaint procedure that is likely to provide redress and to avoid harm without exposing an individual who reports or is subjected to harassment to unreasonable risk, effort, or expense. (b) Not more than 3 days after receiving notice of the harassment, provides supportive measures that preserve and restore equal access of an individual who reports or is subjected to harassment to the institution's services, activities, or programs, regardless of whether the individual requests an investigation, that include, but are not limited to, all of the following measures: (i) Adapting course schedules, assignments, or tests. (ii) Issuing no-contact orders. (iii) Providing counseling services. (iv) Altering activities, housing, or employment. (v) Adjusting grades or transcripts. (vi) Preserving eligibility for leadership positions, scholarships, and other programs or activities, even if the individual no longer meets the attendance, grade, or credit requirement. (vii) Allowing absences, leaves of absence, incompletes, or withdrawals without financial penalty. (viii) Providing services to escort the individual around campus for safety reasons. (ix) Increasing monitoring or supervision at locations or in activities where the alleged harassment occurred. (x) Temporary measures that burden the alleged harasser that are imposed for nonpunitive and nondisciplinary reasons and are designed to protect the safety of the individual who reported the harassment or other individuals. (c) If requested by an individual who reports or is subjected to harassment or the parent or legal guardian of the individual if the individual is a minor, or if otherwise necessary to protect the individual or other individuals in the institution's services, activities, or programs from a significant ongoing threat of harm, undertakes a prompt, thorough, and impartial investigation of the harassment. (d) If voluntary informed consent is obtained from all of the following individuals, facilitates a process in accordance with restorative practices as that term is defined in section 1310c of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1310c: (i) The individual who reports or is subjected to harassment. (ii) The alleged harasser. (iii) If the individual who reports or is subjected to harassment is a minor, the parent or legal guardian of the individual. (iv) If the alleged harasser is a minor, the parent or legal guardian of the alleged harasser. (e) Takes other necessary, prompt, and appropriate corrective action designed to stop the harassment, prevent its recurrence, and remedy its effects. (5) For purposes of subsection (4), an educational institution must establish reasonable care as required under subsection (4) even if further harassment did not occur after the educational institution receives notice of the initial harassment. Sec. 402a. (1) An educational institution shall designate at least 1 employee as a confidential employee who does not need to report harassment to the educational institution, unless otherwise required by law. (2) If an individual discloses harassment to a confidential employee, the confidential employee must inform the individual about all of the following: (a) How to report the harassment to the educational institution's civil rights coordinator or other personnel designated by the educational institution to receive reports of harassment. (b) How the civil rights coordinator or other personnel can help the individual. (c) That the confidential employee will not report the harassment to the civil rights coordinator or educational institution. Sec. 402b. The civil rights coordinator at an educational institution, upon receipt of a report of harassment from an individual, shall notify the individual in writing or orally and in a manner that is age-appropriate and accessible about resources and services that are available to the individual to ensure the individual's equal access to education that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) If provided by the educational institution, supportive measures described in section 402(4)(b). (b) Information about community-based support services, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (i) Services for counseling, mental health, substance abuse, or other health issues. (ii) Legal, housing, or victim advocates. (c) Reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities who report harassment and alleged harassers with disabilities, including preexisting disabilities and disabilities that arise out of the harassment, that are consistent with all of the following: (i) Section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973, 29 USC 794. (ii) The Americans with disabilities act of 1990, 42 USC 12101 to 12213. (iii) The individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1400 to 1482. (iv) Any other federal law related to disabilities. Sec. 402c. (1) If an educational institution receives a report of harassment, the educational institution shall not do any of the following to the individual who reports or is subjected to the harassment or an individual who is a witness to the harassment: (a) Take disciplinary action for a code of conduct violation committed by the individual that is related to the harassment, including, but not limited to, the use of intoxicating substances that occurred at or around the time of the harassment, reasonable actions taken to defend against the harassment, or actions to avoid contact with the individual who committed the alleged harassment. (b) Take disciplinary action for disclosing, in good faith, nonharassing sexual activity related to the harassment or for other nonharassing sexual activity discovered during an investigation into the harassment, even if the educational institution otherwise prohibits the nonharassing sexual activity. (c) Take disciplinary action for making a false report only because the educational institution concludes there is insufficient evidence to make a determination of whether the harassment occurred or because the alleged harasser is found not responsible for the harassment. (d) Require the individual who reports or is subjected to harassment to do any of the following because the individual alleged discrimination, including harassment: (i) Unenroll from the educational institution. (ii) Take a temporary leave of absence from the educational institution. (iii) Transfer from the educational institution. (iv) Enroll in an alternative education program. (e) Require the individual to sign a confidentiality agreement as a prerequisite to obtain supportive measures, participate in an investigation or informal resolution, or assert any other rights under civil rights laws. (f) Discipline the individual for violating an impermissible confidentiality agreement described in subdivision (e) unless otherwise allowed by law. (g) Take disciplinary action for a complaint of alleged misconduct that the educational institution knows or should have known is filed by an alleged harasser or other individual for the purpose of retaliation against the individual who reports or is subjected to harassment. (2) An educational institution shall do all of the following: (a) Require the educational institution's civil rights coordinator or civil rights coordinator's designee to review any disciplinary actions against an individual who reports or is subjected to harassment or a witness to harassment to ensure that any disciplinary action is not related to the harassment. If the educational institution takes disciplinary action against the individual that is not prohibited under subsection (1), the disciplinary action must not discriminate against or harass the individual, including, but not limited to, by requiring the individual to participate in therapy or a program focused on altering the individual's sexual orientation or gender identity. (b) Address reports of retaliation against an individual who reports or is subjected to harassment and other individuals, which may include investigating or disciplining individuals who engage in retaliation. Sec. 606. (1) A person alleging a violation of this act may bring a civil action for appropriate injunctive relief or damages, or both. (2) An action commenced pursuant to subsection (1) may be brought in the circuit court for the county where the alleged violation occurred, or for the county where the person against whom the civil complaint is filed resides or has his or her principal place of business. (3) As used in subsection (1), "damages" means damages for injury or loss, including, but not limited to, emotional distress, caused by each violation of this act, including, but not limited to, compensatory damages, punitive damages, and reasonable attorneys' attorney fees. (4) The amount of compensation awarded for lost wages under this act for an injury under article 2 shall must be reduced by the amount of compensation received for lost wages under the worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.101 to 418.941, for that injury and by the present value of the future compensation for lost wages to be received under the worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.101 to 418.941, for that injury. (5) A person with a disability may not bring a civil action under subsection (1) for a failure to accommodate under article 2 unless he or she the person with a disability has notified the person of the need for accommodation as required under section 210(18). This subsection does not apply if the person failed to comply with the requirements of section 210(19). Sec. 606a. A court, in rendering a judgment in an action brought under this article, may award all or a portion of the costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney fees, witness fees, and expert witness fees, to the complainant in the action if the court determines that the award is appropriate.